Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.220

Redemption of decedent's mortgaged estate.

If any person die having mortgaged any real or personal estate, and shall not have devised the same, or provided for any redemption thereof by will, the court, upon the application of any person interested, may order the personal representative to redeem the estate out of the assets, if it should appear to the satisfaction of the court that such redemption would be beneficial to the estate and not injurious to creditors.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.220. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 143; RRS s 1513; prior: Code 1881 s 1523; 1854 p 289 s 133.]